Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 43

Office of State Geographer

4-43-101. Creation.

There is hereby created the office of state geographer.

Acts 1993, ch. 274, § 1.

4-43-102. Appointment — Term of office.

The state geographer shall be appointed by the governor to serve a term of three (3) years and may be reappointed to serve additional terms. The state geographer shall serve at the pleasure of the governor and shall report to the governor or the governor's designee and to the appropriate official of any agency for which such geographer has contracted to perform work.

Acts 1993, ch. 274, § 2.

4-43-103. Qualifications.

The state geographer shall hold a graduate degree in geography, have the confidence of professional colleagues and possess a record of public service.

Acts 1993, ch. 274, § 3.

4-43-104. Duties.

The state geographer shall be available at all times to serve as a consultant, advisor or director of research on geographic matters of interest to, and at the request of, appropriate officials in state government on a task-by-task contract basis.

Acts 1993, ch. 274, § 4.

4-43-105. Service without staff, expenses or salary.

The state geographer shall serve without staff, expenses, or salary.

Acts 1993, ch. 274, § 5.